Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7863.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 27-7-2.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-7 entitled "Liability
Insurance" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-7-2.1. Uninsured motorist coverage.
(a) No policy insuring against loss resulting from liability imposed by law for property
damage caused by collision, bodily injury, or death suffered by any person arising out of the
ownership, maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle shall be delivered or issued for delivery in this
state with respect to any motor vehicle registered or principally garaged in this state unless coverage
is provided in or supplemental to the policy, for bodily injury or death in limits set forth in each
policy, but in no instance less than the limits set forth in § 31-47-2(13)(i)(A) under provisions
approved by the insurance commissioner, for the protection of persons insured under the policy
who are legally entitled to recover damages from owners or operators of uninsured motor vehicles
and hit-and-run motor vehicles because of property damage, bodily injury, sickness, or disease,
including death, resulting from that injury, sickness, or disease. The insurer shall provide uninsured
motorist coverage in an amount equal to the insured’s bodily injury liability limits. The named
insured shall have the option of selecting a limit in writing less than the bodily injury liability
coverage, but in no event less than the limits set forth in § 31-47-2(13)(i)(A), unless the named
insured is purchasing only the minimum coverage required by compulsory insurance provisions of
the general laws, in which case the limit can be reduced to zero, but only after signing an advisory
notice approved by the director of business regulation concerning the hazard of uninsured and

underinsured motorists. That coverage shall also apply in the case of a responsible party whose
liability insurance carrier was insolvent at the time of the accident or became insolvent subsequent
to the accident.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), the named insured shall have the
option to reject, in writing, uninsured motorist coverage for loss resulting from damage to property.
If the named insured has collision coverage for property damage to his or her vehicle, then no
coverage for uninsured motorist property damage shall be required unless the insured at his or her
option chooses to purchase that coverage.
(c) For the purposes of this section:
(1) “Policy insuring against loss” means a policy that provides primary coverage for the
insured motor vehicle; and
(2) “Property damage” means injury to or destruction of the insured vehicle, including its
loss of use and any property, excluding business property, owned by the insured while contained
in the insured vehicle.
(d) After the selection of limits by the named insured or the exercise of the right to reject
that portion of the coverage that applies to property damage, the insurer or any affiliated insurer
shall be required to notify the policyholder, in any renewal, reinstatement, substitute, amended,
altered, modified, transfer, or replacement policy, as to the availability of that coverage or optional
limits. The insured may, subject to the limitations expressed in this chapter, make a written request
for higher limits, newly added coverage, or coverage more extensive than that provided on a prior
policy.
(e) Property damage caused by collision shall be subject to a two hundred dollar ($200)
deductible per claim unless otherwise agreed. Any claim submitted under the property damage
portion of this section must include the name, address, and other means of identification to establish
that the at-fault operator is without insurance. The rate for this coverage will be established as a
percentage of the existing base collision insurance rate as utilized by the majority of companies, to
be determined by the insurance commissioner.
(f) Whenever, through subrogation, an insurance company or its insurance producer
collects a casualty loss from a third party, that company or insurance producer shall, from the funds
collected, first pay to the insured the deductible portion of the casualty loss less the prorated share
of subrogation expense and only after this retain any funds in excess of the deductible portion of
the recovery.
(g) For the purposes of this section “uninsured motorist” shall include an underinsured
motorist. An “underinsured motorist” is the owner or operator of a motor vehicle who carries
LC005156 - Page 2 of 4

automobile liability insurance with coverage in an amount less than the limits or damages that
persons insured pursuant to this section are legally entitled to recover because of bodily injury,
sickness, or disease, including death, resulting from that injury, sickness, or disease.
(h) A person entitled to recover damages pursuant to this section shall not be required to
make a claim against or bring an action against the uninsured or underinsured tortfeasor as a
prerequisite to recover damages from the insurer providing coverage pursuant to this section. In the
event that the person entitled to recover against an underinsured motorist recovers from the insurer
providing coverage pursuant to this section, that insurer shall be entitled to subrogation rights
against the underinsured motorist and his or her insurance carrier. Release of the tortfeasor with the
consent of the company providing the underinsured coverage shall not extinguish or bar the claim
of the insured against the underinsurance carrier regardless of whether the claim has been
liquidated.
(i) Whenever an insured has paid two (2) or more separate premiums for uninsured
motorists’ coverage in a single policy of insurance or under several policies with the same insurance
company, the insured shall be permitted to collect up to the aggregate amount of coverage for all
of the vehicles insured, regardless of any language in the policy to the contrary.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027, and shall apply prospectively to
any new or renewed policy of insurance issued or renewed after January 1, 2027.
========
LC005156
========
LC005156 - Page 3 of 4